dev/kaa.Latn_2016-Cyrl.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%{'%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
%- Alpha ; 
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

a:а AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
á:ә AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ;
b:б AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ch:ч AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;  ! FIXME
c:ц AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;   ! FIXME
d:д AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
e:е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
f:ф AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
g:г AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ǵ:ғ AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ;
h:ҳ AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
i:и AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ı:ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
İ:И AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
I:Ы AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
j:ж AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
k:к AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
l:л AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
m:м AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
n:н AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
ń:ң AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
o:о AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ó:ө AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ;
p:п AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
q:қ AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
r:р AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
s:с AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;     ! FIXME
sh:ш AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;   ! FIXME
t:т AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
u:у AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ú:ү AlphaLoop "weight: 0.5" ;
v:в AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
w:ў AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
x:х AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
y:й AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ya:я AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
yo:ё AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
yu:ю AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ye:е AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
z:з AlphaLoop "weight: 2.0" ;
ʻ:0 AlphaLoop "weight: 10.0" ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
